th: วัสดุที่ใช้ทำกระสอบทราย: ผ้าใบ; สำลี; ผ้า; หนังเทียม; ผ้าขนแกะ; โฟม; ยางพารา; หนัง; ตาข่าย; นีโอพรีน; ไนลอน; พลาสติก; โพลีเอสเตอร์; ยาง; ทราย; ขี้เลื่อย; สังเคราะห์; ไวนิล; อื่นๆ
pt-BR: Material do saco de pancadas/treinamento: Tela; Algodão; Tecido; Couro falso; Lã; Espuma; Látex; Couro; Malha; Neoprene; Nylon; Plástico; Poliéster; Borracha; Areia; Serragem; Sintético; Vinil; Outro
de: Boxsack-/Trainingssackmaterial: Leinwand; Baumwolle; Stoff; Kunstleder; Vlies; Schaumstoff; Latex; Leder; Netz; Neopren; Nylon; Kunststoff; Polyester; Gummi; Sand; Sägespäne; Synthetisch; Vinyl; Sonstiges
pt-PT: Material do saco de box/treino: Tela; Algodão; Tecido; Couro falso; Velo; Espuma; Látex; Pele; Rede; Neoprene; Náilon; Plástico; Poliéster; Borracha; Areia; Serradura; Sintético; Vinil; Outro
sv: Boxnings-/träningssäck - material: Kanvas; Bomull; Tyg; Fuskläder; Fleece; Skum; Latex; Läder; Mesh; Neopren; Nylon; Plast; Polyester; Gummi; Sand; Sawdust; Syntetisk; Vinyl; Övrigt
es: Material del punching/saco de entrenamiento: Lienzo; Algodón; Tejido; Cuero sintético; Vellón; Espuma; Látex; Cuero; Malla; Neopreno; Nylon; Plástico; Poliéster; Goma; Arena; Serrín; Sintético; Vinilo; Otros
zh-TW: 拳擊/訓練沙包材質: 帆布; 棉布; 布料; 人造皮; 刷毛布; 泡棉; 乳膠; 皮製; 網布; 氯丁橡膠; 尼龍; 塑膠; 聚酯; 橡膠; 沙子; 鋸末; 合成; 乙烯基; 其他
zh-CN: 拳击/训练沙袋材料: 画布; 棉布; 面料/布料; 人造皮革; 羊毛; 泡沫; 乳胶; 皮革; 网状; 氯丁橡胶; 尼龙; 塑料; 聚酯纤维; 橡胶; 沙子; 锯末; 合成; 乙烯基贴纸; 其他
ja: パンチング/トレーニングバッグ素材: キャンバス; コットン; 布・生地; フェイクレザー; フリース; フォーム; ラテックス; レザー; メッシュ; ネオプレン; ナイロン; プラスチック; ポリエステル; ゴム; 砂; おがくず; 合成品; ビニール; その他
nl: Materiaal boks-/trainingszakken: Canvas; Katoen; Stof; Kunstleer; Fleece; Schuim; Latex; Leer; Gaas; Neopreen; Nylon; Plastic; Polyester; Rubber; Zand; Zaagsel; Synthetisch; Vinyl; Andere
pl: Materiał worka treningowego: Płótno; Bawełna; Tkanina; Skaj; Polar; Piana; Lateks; Skórzane; Siatka; Neopren; Nylon; Tworzywo sztuczne; Poliester; Guma; Piasek; Trociny; Syntetyczne; Winyl; Inne
it: Materiale del sacco da boxe/allenamento: Tela; Cotone; Tessuto; Ecopelle; Felpa; Schiuma; Lattice; Pelle; Mesh; Neoprene; Nylon; Plastica; Poliestere; Gomma; Sabbia; Segatura; Sintetico; Vinile; Altro
hr-HR: Materijal vreće za udaranje/trening: Platno; Pamuk; Tkanina; Umjetna koža; Flis; Pjena; Lateks; Koža; Mrežica; Neopren; Najlon; Plastika; Poliester; Guma; Pijesak; Piljevina; Sintetika; Vinil; Ostalo
nb: Punching- og treningsbagmateriale: Lerret; Bomull; Stoff; Kunstig lær; Fleece; Skum; Lateks; Skinn; Mesh; Neopren; Nylon; Plast; Polyester; Gummi; Sand; Sagflis; Syntetisk; Vinyl; Annet
da: Bokse-/træningspudemateriale: Lærred; Bomuld; Stof; Kunstigt læder; Fleece; Skum; Latex; Læder; Mesh; Neopren; Nylon; Plast; Polyester; Gummi; Sand; Savsmuld; Syntetisk; Vinyl; Andet
cs: Materiál boxovacího pytle: Plátno; Bavlna; Látky; Nepravá kůže; Flís; Pěna; Latex; Kůže; Síťovina; Neoprén; Nylon; Plast; Polyester; Guma; Písek; Piliny; Syntetické; Vinylové; Jiné
en: Punching/Training bag material: Canvas; Cotton; Fabric; Faux leather; Fleece; Foam; Latex; Leather; Mesh; Neoprene; Nylon; Plastic; Polyester; Rubber; Sand; Sawdust; Synthetic; Vinyl; Other
sk-SK: Materiál boxovacieho/tréningového vreca: Plátno; Bavlna; Tkanina; Umelá koža; Flís; Pena; Latex; Koža; Sieťovina; Neoprén; Nylon; Plast; Polyester; Guma; Piesok; Piliny; Syntetika; Vinyl; Iné
hu: Boxzsák/edzőtáska anyaga: Vászon; Pamut; Szövet; Műbőr; Gyapjú; Hab; Latex; Bőr; Háló; Neoprén; Nejlon; Műanyag; Poliészter; Gumi; Homok; Fűrészpor; Szintetikus; Vinil; Egyéb
tr: Kum Torbası ve Antrenman Torbalası malzemesi: Tuval; Pamuk; Kumaşlar; Suni deri; Yapağı; Köpük; Lateks; Deri; Ağ; Neopren; Plastik; Plastik; Poliyester; Kauçuk; Kum; Talaş; Sentetik; Vinil; Diğer
vi: Vật liệu bao cát đấm bốc: Toan; Vải bông; Vải; Da giả; Nỉ cào; Bọt xốp; Mủ cao su; Da; Lưới; Neoprene; Nylon; Nhựa; Polyester; Cao su; Lốp đi trên cát; Mạt cưa; Tổng hợp; Nhựa vinyl; Khác
bg-BG: Материал за боксов чувал/боксова круша: Брезент; Памук; Плат; Изкуствена кожа; Полар; Пяна; Латекс; Кожа; Мрежа; Неопрен; Найлон; Пластмаса; Полиестер; Каучук; Пясък; Дървени стърготини; Синтетичен; Винил; Други
ru: Материал груши/мешка: Холщовая ткань; Хлопок; Ткань; Искусственная кожа; Флис; Поролон; Латекс; Кожа; Сетка; Неопрен; Нейлон; Пластик; Полиэстер; Резина; Песок; Опилки; Синтетика; Винил; Другой
fr: Matériau du sac de boxe/entraînement: Toiles; Coton; Tissu; Faux cuir; Polaire; Mousse; Latex; Cuir; A mailles; Néoprène; Nylon; Plastique; Polyester; Caoutchouc; Sable; Sciure de bois; Synthétique; Vinyl; Autre
ko: 샌드백 재료: 캔버스; 면; 패브릭; 인조 가죽; 플리스; 거품; 라텍스; 가죽; 메쉬; 네오프렌; 나일론; 플라스틱; 폴리에스테르; 고무; 모래; 톱밥; 인조; 비닐; 기타
ro-RO: Material saci de box/de antrenament: Pânză; Bumbac; Material textil; Imitație de piele; Polar; Spumă; Latex; Piele; Plasă; Neopren; Nailon; Plastic; Poliester; Cauciuc; Nisip; Rumeguș; Sintetic; Vinyl; Altele
el: Υλικό σάκου μποξ/προπόνησης: Καμβάς; Βαμβάκι; Ύφασμα; Συνθετικό δέρμα; Φλις; Αφρός; Λάτεξ; Δερμάτινο; Πλέγμα; Νεοπρένιο; Νάιλον; Πλαστικό; Πολυεστέρας; Καουτσούκ; Για την άμμο; Πριονίδια; Συνθετικό; Βινύλιο; Άλλο
lt-LT: Treniruočių kriaušes / bokso maišų medžiaga: Drobė; Medvilnė; Audinys; Dirbtinė oda; Flisas; Porolonas; Lateksas; Oda; Tinklelis; Neoprenas; Nailonas; Plastikas; Poliesteris; Kaučiukas; Smėlis; Pjuvenos; Sintetika; Vinilas; Kita
sl-SI: Material boksarske/vadbene vreče: Platno; Bombaž; Tkanina; Umetno usnje; Flis; Pena; Latex; Usnje; Mreža; Neopren; Najlon; Plastika; Poliester; Guma; Pesek; Žagovina; Sintetika; Vinil; Drugo
fi: Nyrkkeily- ja harjoitussäkit: Kanvaasi; Puuvilla; Kangas; Keinonahka; Fleece; Vaahto; Lateksi; Nahka; Verkko; Neopreeni; Nailon; Muovi; Polyesteri; Kumi; Hiekka; Sahanpuru; Synteettinen; Vinyyli; Muu